Utah statutes.
59-1-704.   Restraint of collection restricted.
(1)  Except as otherwise provided in Parts 5, 6, and 7 of Chapter 1 and
Chapters 2, 6, 7, 10, and 12 and the rules promulgated thereunder, no suit for
the purpose of restraining the assessment or collection of any tax, penalty,
or interest imposed under Chapter 1, 2, 6, 7, 10, or 12 may be maintained in
any court by any person, whether or not such person is the person against whom
such tax was assessed.
(2)  No suit may be maintained in any court for the purpose of restraining the
assessment or collection of the amount of the state tax liability of a
transferee or of a fiduciary of property of a taxpayer.
